Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 1 COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER EDUCATION
23-1-134. Commission directive - open educational resources - course notice - report - definitions.

The commission shall adopt guidelines to require public institutions of higher education to ensure that, beginning in the fall of 2021, students are informed prior to course registration, and beginning no later than the fall of 2025, students are also informed at the point of course registration, concerning which courses and sections use open educational resources or other low-cost materials.

The department shall review the policies pertaining to the creation and use of open educational resources, including open licensing policies, adopted by public institutions of higher education throughout the state. The department shall identify and determine the efficacy of any provisions included in said policies that expand the use and promote the sustainability of open educational resources.

Notwithstanding the requirement in section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before October 1, 2021, and on or before October 1 each year thereafter through October 1, 2026, the department shall prepare and shall submit to the commission, the council, the joint budget committee, and the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, a report concerning implementation and development of open educational resources around the state. The department shall work with the council in preparing the report, and the public institutions of higher education shall collaborate with the department and council in providing the information necessary for the report. At a minimum, the report must include:

The degree to which all public institutions of higher education are adopting open educational resources support programs and ensuring universal awareness of open educational resources among faculty and students;

Descriptions and evaluations of the efficacy of provisions included in open educational resources policies across the state that expand the use and promote the sustainability of open educational resources;

The number and percentage of the courses offered by the public institutions of higher education that use open educational resources as the primary resources for the course;

The number and percentage of the degree programs offered by the public institutions of higher education that are zero-textbook-cost degree programs;

The open educational resources created and shared by grant program recipients;

The number of open educational resources revised and adopted by grant program recipients;

For public institutions of higher education that receive a grant through the grant program or that employ faculty or staff that receive a grant, the course enrollment, completion, and pass rates for courses that use open educational resources compared to courses that do not use these resources and the enrollment and completion rates for zero-textbook-cost degree programs compared to other degree programs; and

The summarized information concerning implementation of the grant program as described in section 23-4.5-104 (4)(a).

As used in this section:

"Council" means the open educational resources council created in section 23-4.5-103.

"Grant program" means the open educational resources grant program created in section 23-4.5-104.

"Public institution of higher education" has the same meaning as provided in section 23-4.5-102 (7).

"Zero-textbook-cost degree program" has the same meaning as provided in section 23-4.5-102 (8).

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-258), ch. 191, p. 693, § 1, effective May 3.

L. 2018:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 18-1331), ch. 186, p. 1259, § 2, effective April 30.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-215), ch. 97, p. 389, § 7, effective May 5.

23-1-135. Department directive - undergraduate degree and certificate programs - annual return on investment report - definition - repeal.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Colorado's economic growth depends upon a strong workforce with the education and training necessary to succeed in twenty-first-century careers;

Colorado's state system of higher education is the primary source of education and training for Coloradans pursuing these careers;

Further, Colorado's system of higher education must meet the postsecondary education needs of all of its residents, including providing reasonable access to higher education statewide, in order for Colorado to succeed in meeting its goals for an educated workforce;

With future state funding levels for higher education uncertain due to competing demands on the state's budget, the state has an obligation to taxpayers and to consumers of higher education in Colorado to make the best possible use of state resources; and

Ensuring that state policymakers and consumers of higher education have access to information concerning undergraduate degree and certificate programs, including student costs and average debt, as well as employment and earnings outcomes, is critical to evaluating higher education program choices as well as Colorado's economic and workforce goals.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that it is appropriate for the department of higher education to prepare an annual return on investment report that includes an analysis of student costs and employment outcomes of undergraduate degree or certificate programs offered at Colorado public institutions of higher education.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "institution of higher education" or "institution" means the state institutions, as defined in section 23-18-102 (10)(a), the local district colleges, and the area technical colleges.

On or before July 31, 2019, and on or before July 31 each year thereafter, the department of higher education shall prepare a return on investment report of undergraduate degree and certificate programs offered by institutions of higher education. The department, in consultation with the governing boards of the institutions, shall determine the designation of degree and certificate programs for purposes of the return on investment report.

The return on investment report must include information concerning the undergraduate degree and certificate programs offered at each institution including, at a minimum:

The number of students enrolled in the undergraduate degree or certificate program and the number of degrees and certificates awarded annually for the program, specifically identifying the number of high school students enrolled and the number of degrees and certificates awarded through the career development success program created in section 22-54-138;

The average time to completion for students completing the undergraduate degree or certificate program and the average number of credits earned by students completing the degree or certificate program;

The average cost for completion of the undergraduate degree or certificate program, including mandatory program and institutional fees, for a student with in-state tuition classification;

The average student loan debt for students in the undergraduate degree or certificate program;

The employment rate of undergraduate degree or certificate program graduates. For purposes of the report, information relating to the employment rate includes the number of individual graduates, the number of individual graduates matched through available data sources, and the number of individual graduates that are not included in the employment rate, with an explanation of why the graduates are excluded from the employment rate.

The average annual earnings of undergraduate degree or certificate program graduates one, five, and ten years after graduation or completion; and

Any other information necessary to complete the return on investment report.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the department shall annually submit the return on investment report to the education committees of the house of representatives and of the senate, or any successor committees, and shall post the report on the department's website for public access.

(4.5) The department may collect the data necessary to calculate return on investment metrics similar to the information described in subsection (3)(b) of this section from a private occupational school, as defined by section 23-64-103 (20), approved by the private occupational school board; or an out-of-state public institution, as defined by section 23-2-102 (9), private college or university, as defined by section 23-2-102 (11), private nonprofit college or university, as defined by section 23-2-102 (12), private occupational school, as defined by section 23-2-102 (13), or seminary or religious training institution, as defined by section 23-2-102 (14), authorized by the commission. The department may include the collected information in the return on investment report.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2027.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1226), ch. 246, p. 1519, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2020:

(4.5) added, (HB 20-1280), ch. 96, p. 376, § 1, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

(3)(b)(I) amended, (SB 21-119), ch. 383, p. 2567, § 3, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-119, see section 1 of chapter 383, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-1-136. Department directive - federal student loan repayment and forgiveness program information.

In addition to any other powers and duties set forth in law, the department shall annually distribute to the governing board for each state institution of higher education informational materials received from the department of personnel pursuant to section 24-5-102 relating to federal student loan repayment programs and student loan forgiveness programs.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-057), ch. 35, p. 115, § 8, effective August 2.

23-1-137. Prohibition on use of American Indian mascots - exemptions - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"American Indian mascot" means a name, symbol, or image that depicts or refers to an American Indian tribe, individual, custom, or tradition that is used as a mascot, nickname, logo, letterhead, or team name for the school.

"Public institution of higher education" means a public college, university, community college, area technical college, educational center, local district college, or junior college that is supported in whole or in part by general fund money.

Except as provided for in subsection (2)(b) of this section, on or after June 1, 2022, a public institution of higher education in the state is prohibited from using an American Indian mascot. Any public institution of higher education that is using such an American Indian mascot as of June 1, 2022, must immediately cease use of such American Indian mascot.

The prohibition set forth in subsection (2)(a) of this section does not apply to:

Any agreement that exists prior to June 30, 2021, between a federally recognized Indian tribe and a public institution of higher education. A public institution of higher education that is a party to such an agreement is held to a high standard and expected to honor the agreement. The federally recognized Indian tribe has the right and ability to revoke any such agreement at any time at its discretion.

Any public institution of higher education that is operated by a federally recognized Indian tribe or with the approval of a federally recognized Indian tribe and existing within the boundaries of such tribe's reservation.

For each month during which a public institution of higher education uses an American Indian mascot after June 1, 2022, the public institution of higher education shall pay a fine of twenty-five thousand dollars to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money received to the state education fund created in section 17 (4) of article IX of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-116), ch. 370, p. 2441, § 4, effective June 28.

L. 2022:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2974, § 46, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-116, see section 1 of chapter 370, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-1-138. Commission directive - institutional role and mission - service areas - workforce development - study - report - legislative declaration - repeal.

The general assembly finds that, due in part to the challenges and pressures caused by the global COVID-19 pandemic, institutions of higher education are facing new operational and economic realities driven by declining enrollment, increasing demand for remote learning options, and the increasing costs of providing in-person education and maintaining physical campuses. These new realities create opportunities to systemically re-examine and reconsider the operations and interactions of the state institutions of higher education and how each institution, individually and in cooperation with the other institutions, may most effectively meet the educational needs of Colorado's citizens and Colorado's workforce needs. The general assembly finds, therefore, that it is appropriate to re-examine the role and mission and service areas of the state institutions of higher education, local district colleges, and area technical colleges and the role of the state institutions of higher education, local district colleges, and area technical colleges in providing effective and efficient workforce development.

No later than August 1, 2021, the commission shall convene a task force to review the role and mission and service area of each state institution of higher education, as defined in section 23-18-102 (10)(a), the local district colleges created pursuant to article 71 of this title 23, and the area technical colleges, and the interaction between the institutions of higher education, the local district colleges, the area technical colleges, and the state work force development council in supporting and improving workforce development. The task force, at a minimum, must include a representative from the governing board for each state institution of higher education, including the state board for community colleges and occupational education; a representative from the board of trustees for each local district college; a representative of the area technical colleges; a representative from the state work force development council created in section 24-46.3-101; postsecondary student representatives appointed by the commission from a variety of higher education institutions around the state; a representative of a private, nonprofit institution of higher education; a person employed by a school district or a public elementary or secondary school; a representative of the business community; two representatives from higher education advocacy groups; and at least one representative from the commission. In addition, the task force shall work with the advisory committee to the commission, created in section 23-1-103, and with the education leadership council convened by executive order B 2017-001. A representative of the commission shall serve as the chair of the task force. The department shall provide staff support to the task force.

At a minimum, the task force shall:

Review the role and mission and service area of each state institution of higher education, each local district college, and each area technical college, including all instruction offered by whatever means outside the geographic boundaries of a campus as described in section 23-1-109 (4), to determine whether the availability of and access to postsecondary credential programs is sufficient throughout the state without undue overlap and to ensure the most efficient use of resources;

Review the history, purpose, effect, and continuing benefit of service areas and the commission's policy concerning service areas and, based on the degree to which service areas improve and add value to the delivery of postsecondary education within the state and support the state's postsecondary access and attainment goals, recommend whether the service areas should continue and whether the service areas should be redrawn;

Examine ways in which to leverage best practices through data and technology to make informed decisions about interventions that drive student success; create multiple and linked pathways to postsecondary credentials, including the development of incremental credentials that a student may attain while working toward a baccalaureate degree; and ensure equitable access and benefit to students, including minimizing costs and time spent in attaining a credential or degree;

Examine strategies for increasing student retention and completion and to address the consequences students experience when they incur debt in attending an institution of higher education or local district college without completing a degree or other credential;

Develop effective strategies for leveraging federal higher education reforms, including the possibility of funding for two years of postsecondary enrollment for each student, to raise the completion rate for two-year and four-year degree programs;

Review the role of the state institutions of higher education, the local district colleges, the area technical colleges, and the state work force development council in designing and promoting career pathways and other workforce development initiatives. The goal of the review is to determine how the roles of higher education and the state work force development council may be thoughtfully integrated to reduce overlap and facilitate greater efficiencies and economies in providing workforce development and skills training for traditional and nontraditional students and to support and meet the needs of the workforce and the professional, industrial, and business sectors in Colorado.

Review possible uses of money transferred to the workers, employers, and workforce centers cash fund pursuant to section 24-75-231 (2)(b)(I)(A) for programs, services, or other assistance for populations disproportionately impacted by the COVID-19 public health emergency that address or mitigate the impacts of the public health emergency on educational disparities.

The task force shall prepare a report of findings and recommendations developed pursuant to this section, including recommendations concerning the role and mission and service area for each state institution of higher education, the local district colleges, and the area technical colleges and recommendations for the use of money transferred to the workers, employers, and workforce centers cash fund pursuant to section 24-75-231 (2)(b)(I)(A), as described in subsection (2)(b)(VII) of this section. No later than December 15, 2021, the task force shall submit the report to the commission and to the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, and shall post the report on the department's website.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2022.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1330), ch. 377, p. 2508, § 13, effective June 29.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1330, see section 1 of chapter 377, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-1-139. Department directive - contract for use of online platform for public benefits.

The department shall contract for and facilitate the use of an online platform by any institution of higher education in Colorado, whether public or private, in order to assist students in accessing public benefits. Individual institutions that use the online platform that the department contracts for are required to contribute financially for use of the platform.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-182), ch. 356, p. 2542, § 1, effective June 3.

23-1-140. Commission directive - statewide student success measures - definitions.

No later than December 31, 2022, the commission shall enact a policy directing the department to develop student success measures that measure the progression of students through postsecondary education and the impact of postsecondary pathways on a student's career opportunities and success.

The student success measures must include postsecondary success measures and workforce success measures. The commission shall prioritize development of the postsecondary success measures. Postsecondary success measures may include, but are not limited to, credit accumulation, course passage, cost of attendance, retention rates, credential completion rates, student support access and effectiveness, graduate program enrollment, and student mobility. The student success measures must include data on nontraditional students who are not first-time, full-time freshman students, including graduation rates for nontraditional students, and credential and certificate completion rates for transfer students. The student success measures must also include measures for student enrollment status two, four, and six years after a student enrolls in an institution of higher education. Workforce success measures may include, but are not limited to, postsecondary employment outcomes for students, job placements, earnings, and the length of time it takes a student to recoup the cost of completing a credential at an institution based on the student's increased earnings, known as the price-to-earnings premium. The commission shall determine which specific postsecondary and workforce success measures are included in its policy.

In developing the student success measures, the department shall collaborate with the commission, each institution of higher education, the Colorado workforce development council, the department of labor and employment, the department of education, the office of economic development and international trade, representatives from industry, and organizations that support current or potential students and parents.

The department, in consultation with institutions of higher education and subject to the approval of the commission, shall determine the methodology used to calculate the measures.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1349), ch. 349, p. 2493, § 2, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1349, see section 1 of chapter 349, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

23-1-141. Student success data system - student success data transparency - appropriation - definition - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "institution of higher education" or "institution" means the state institutions, as defined in section 23-18-102 (10)(a), the local district colleges, and the area technical colleges.

The department shall create and maintain a statewide data system of student success information to enhance data-based decision-making by institutions and the public in order to increase student success using the student success measures determined by the commission. The data system includes institution interfaces described in subsection (3) of this section and a public interface. The data system must have the functionality to be developed into a longitudinal data system over time that connects K-12, postsecondary, and workforce information.

The commission shall provide guidance to the department on the information that should be included in the data system to align the data system with the student success measures developed pursuant to section 23-1-140.

Each institution shall report postsecondary success information to the department that the department determines necessary for inclusion in the statewide data system.

The department shall obtain student workforce data necessary for the data system by the best means possible, including obtaining employment information and earnings from the department of labor and employment, the Colorado workforce development council, or any other initiative or data-sharing platform that allows the department to obtain workforce data. The department of labor and employment, the Colorado workforce development council, and the department of education shall provide to the department the information that the department deems necessary to implement and operate the data system.

The department may include in the statewide data system employment and wage outcome data of a workforce development or training program that joins the data system. In order to join the data system, a workforce development or training program must be listed in the eligible training provider lists described in section 8-83-225 (1)(c) or receiving funding under Title I of the federal "Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act", 29 U.S.C. sec. 3101 et seq. The department may provide a user-friendly and accessible option for a program described in this subsection (2)(c) to deliver data to the department.

In developing the data system, the department shall collaborate with the Colorado workforce development council, the department of labor and employment, the department of education, and the office of economic development and international trade. The department shall also seek input from each institution of higher education, Colorado employers, Colorado students, and other workforce training providers offering an industry recognized credential.

The department may enter into an agreement with a third party to create and maintain the data system and any materials derived from the system. If the department enters into an agreement with a third party, the department shall ensure that both the department and the third party comply with all state and federal laws and regulations concerning the privacy of student information, including the federal "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1232g, as amended.

The department shall work with an institution to include information on an interface that is internal to that institution. Information available on an institution interface may provide student success data that is more timely, more granular, appears in a different format, or includes functionality that is different from information provided on the public interface.

If an institution maintains or intends to create its own data system that aligns with the goals of the statewide data system and the department determines that there is sufficient alignment, the department may, with the approval of the commission, allocate money to the institution for the creation, improvement, or maintenance of the institution's data system instead of creating an interface that is internal to that institution. The department shall not allocate to the institution an amount greater than the cost to the department for creating an interface that is internal to the institution. An institution that receives an allocation is not exempt from the requirement to report student educational success information to the department pursuant to subsection (2)(b)(II) of this section.

The public interface of the data system includes student success information that is aligned with the student success measures developed pursuant to section 23-1-140. The commission shall determine the specific student success information that must be included in the public interface, including determining how the information is disaggregated by student populations, including populations identified by race, ethnicity, gender, first-generation status, disability, and socioeconomic factors. The public interface must allow a user to conduct an interactive search to view and compare student success information for specific institutions and credential programs so that the user may make informed decisions regarding the economic opportunity and trade-offs of various educational and career training options. The department shall update the data in the public interface as frequently as practicable, but at least annually, to ensure that Colorado students and the public have the most relevant and current information available.

The commission shall, in collaboration with the office in the department that is responsible for developing policy to remove equity gaps in postsecondary education in Colorado, use the data included in the institution and statewide data system to examine educational and workforce success disparities among various student populations, including populations identified by race, ethnicity, gender, first-generation status, disability, age, and socioeconomic factors.

In order to further the goal of using data to improve institutional decision-making and best practices, the commission shall facilitate information sharing among institutions about practices implemented by an institution based on data learned from the data system.

In order to facilitate the collection of student success data and information from institutions of higher education, the department shall update and modernize its data collection systems, including its student-unit record data system.

The department, in collecting data from institutions, may use, when possible, open-source data transparency languages that utilize open, interoperable data formats.

On or before January 15, 2023, and on or before January 15, 2024, the commission shall submit a report to the house of representatives education committee and senate education committee on the work required and any barriers identified, including recommendations for legislative changes necessary, to deliver a statewide longitudinal data system that connects K-12, postsecondary education, and workforce information.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate three million dollars from the workers, employers, and workforce centers cash fund created in section 24-75-231 to the department for the purposes of this section. The money appropriated pursuant to this subsection (8) must be from the money in the workers, employers, and workforce centers cash fund that originated from the general fund. Any unexpended or unencumbered money appropriated pursuant to this section remains available for expenditure for the same purpose in the 2023-24 state fiscal year without further appropriation.

This subsection (8) is repealed, effective December 31, 2024.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1349), ch. 349, p. 2494, § 3, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1349, see section 1 of chapter 349, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.